District of Columbia statutes.
44-103.02

Initial ALR licensure.

(a)

Applications for licensure shall be made in writing on a form or forms prescribed by the Mayor at least 60 days prior to the date needed.

(b)

An applicant for ALR licensure shall pay a licensure fee as determined by the Mayor.

(c)

An ALR license issued by the Mayor shall state the effective date and expiration date of the license and maximum number of residents allowed to reside in the ALR.

(d)

An application for an ALR license shall include the following information:

(1)

Identification of the owner and documentation supporting the fact that the ALR is owned or otherwise under the control of the applicant;

(2)

Identification of the ALA and information concerning the ALA’s qualifications;

(3)

Criminal background check information pursuant to subchapter II of Chapter 5 of this title;

(4)

Documentation and explanation of any prior denial, suspension, or revocation of license to provide care to third parties;

(5)

Location of the ALR;

(6)

Statement of program;

(7)

Proof of solvency;

(8)

Proof of insurance coverage;

(9)

Statement of services to be offered;

(10)

Maximum number of residents planned;

(11)

Verification that the real property where the ALR is located is owned, leased, or otherwise under the control of the applicant; and

(12)

Structure of applicant’s organization and names of board members and officers.

(e)

(1)

The Mayor shall conduct an initial pre-licensure inspection of the premises of the ALR and of its records.

(2)

An applicant for licensure shall provide the following information at the time of the pre-licensure inspection:

(A)

Certificate of occupancy;

(B)

Disaster plan;

(C)

Staffing plan;

(D)

Resident funds management system;

(E)

Medication management system;

(F)

Individual Service Plan policy and procedures;

(G)

Admission, transfer, and discharge policies;

(H)

Resident agreements, both financial and nonfinancial;

(I)

Location of the ALR;

(J)

Maximum number of residents to be served;

(K)

Program statement;

(L)

Proof of solvency; and

(M)

Other reasonably relevant information required by the Mayor.

(f)

Based on information obtained during the pre-licensure inspection required by subsection (e) of this section, the Mayor shall either approve the application unconditionally for 12 months or deny the application.

(g)

The Mayor shall re-inspect an ALR within 6 months of the effective date of the initial licensure.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 302, 47 DCR 2647
This section is referenced in § 44-103.04 and § 44-103.06.